Hawaii, session 2026, SB2377.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 708, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part III to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§708-    Criminal property damage of a critical infrastructure facility.  (1)  A person commits the offense of criminal property damage of a critical infrastructure facility if the person intentionally or knowingly damages any critical infrastructure facility without the owner or operator's consent. (2) Criminal property damage of a critical infrastructure facility is a class C felony. (3) For the purposes of this section: "Critical infrastructure facility" has the same meaning as "critical infrastructure" defined in section 708-890. "Damage" has the same meaning as defined in section 708‑890." SECTION 2.  Section 708-890, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending the definition of "critical infrastructure" to read as follows: ""Critical infrastructure" means publicly or privately owned or operated systems or assets vital to the defense, security, economic security, public health or safety, or any combination thereof, of the State or nation. "Critical infrastructure" includes: (1)  Gas and oil production, storage, and delivery systems; (2)  Water supply systems; (3)  Telecommunications networks; (4)  Electrical power delivery systems; (5)  Finance and banking systems; (6)  Emergency services, such as medical, police, fire, and rescue services; (7)  Transportation systems and services, such as highways, mass transit, airlines, and airports; [and] (8)  Government operations that provide essential services to the public[.]; and (9)  Broadband, wireless, and cable television networks." SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.